District of Columbia statutes.
31-3505.01

Community health reinvestment.

A corporation shall engage in community health reinvestment to the maximum feasible extent consistent with financial soundness and efficiency.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-245, § 6a
as added Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-369, § 2(c), 56 DCR 1346
This section is referenced in § 31-3506.